District of Columbia statutes.
47-3153

Use of consumer identification information in connection with credit card payments.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall, as a condition of accepting a credit card as payment for a sale of goods or services, request or record the address or telephone number of a credit card holder on the credit card transaction form.

(b)

A person may record the address or telephone number of a credit card holder if the information is necessary for the shipment, delivery, or installation of consumer goods, or special orders of consumer goods or services.

History

Mar. 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-69, § 4, 39 DCR 16
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-3154.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3153.